Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62Q.481, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply. (b) "Chronic disease" means diabetes, asthma,new text begin epilepsy,new text end and allergies requiring the use of epinephrine auto-injectors. (c) "Cost-sharing" means co-payments and coinsurance. (d) "Related medical supplies" means syringes, insulin pens, insulin pumps, test strips, glucometers, continuous glucose monitors, epinephrine auto-injectors, asthma inhalers, and other medical supply items necessary to effectively and appropriately treat a chronic disease or administer a prescription drug prescribed to treat a chronic disease. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, and applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end